Hawaii statutes.
§328-49 What fish and when same may be put
in cold storage for future sale. All catches of the following food fishes,
such as weke, ahuluhulu, kumu, uhu, opelu, oama, manini, moi, amaama, papiopio,
ulua, awa, akule, oio, nehu, maomao, iao, omaka, lauhau, laenihi, puhikii,
akilolo, hahalalu, iheihe, opae, piha, laipala, aholehole, uiui, malolo, kole,
paoo, puhi, auau, ohua aliko, ohua palemo, alaihi, upapalu, uu, ahaaha, puili,
alalauwa, aweoweo, maikoiko, kala, aloiloi, maiii, aalaheo, pakii, oopu nopili,
oopu nakea, mamamo, oopukai, hinalea, hinana, goldfish, catfish, and mudfish,
and all other smaller fishes of any species caught after twelve o'clock noon of
any calendar day, shall be marketed as soon as brought to shore. Any fishes
which cannot be marketed or which remain unsold in the market at the close of
the market in the evening may be placed in cold storage or ice house for future
sale; provided that no fishes shall be so placed in cold storage which have
been caught more than twelve hours, unless the fishes were artificially chilled
as soon as caught, or which have been bruised, torn or otherwise rendered
liable to spoil. [L 1921, c 38, §1; RL 1925, §4260; RL 1935, §1071; RL 1945,
§2240; RL 1955, §51-48; HRS §328-49]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next